Rhode Island statutes. Title 13 Criminals — Correctional Institutions
Chapter 6 Loss of Rights by Prisoners

13-6-1.
Life prisoners deemed civilly dead.

Every person imprisoned in the adult correctional institutions for life shall, with respect to all rights of property, to the bond of matrimony and to all civil rights and relations of any nature whatsoever, be deemed to be dead in all respects, as if his or her natural death had taken place at the time of conviction. However, the bond of matrimony shall not be dissolved, nor shall the rights to property or other rights of the husband or wife of the imprisoned person be terminated or impaired, except on the entry of a lawfully obtained decree for divorce.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 59; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 59; G.L. 1938, ch. 624, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-6-1

.

13-6-2.
Repealed.

13-6-2.1.
Suspension from public office upon conviction — Forfeiture of office upon exhaustion of appeals.

Every person who, while holding elective public office, is convicted of a felony and has exhausted all appeals shall forfeit that public office. The public office shall automatically become vacant by operation of law at the time when the conviction becomes final. The vacancy in office so created shall be filled in accordance with law.

Every person who, while holding elective public office, is convicted of a felony shall be suspended by operation of law from the performance of all official duties until that public official’s legal status is finally determined. While under suspension, that person shall not receive any salary and/or benefit associated with the public office.

If the conviction which prompted the suspension is overturned on appeal, the official shall receive any salary and/or benefit which was withheld.

During the suspension, the duties of the office shall be assumed by the person, if any, who is empowered to assume those duties in the event of the disability of the officeholder.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 418, § 1.

13-6-2.2.
Severability of § 13-6-2.1.

If any of the provisions of §

13-6-2.1

or the application of those provisions to any person or circumstances is held to be invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the section which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of the section are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 418, § 1.

13-6-3.
Wills or conveyances during imprisonment.

No person who shall be sentenced to imprisonment in the adult correctional institutions shall have any power, during his or her imprisonment, to make a will, or any conveyance of his or her property, or of any part of that property, except by permission of the superior court granted on petition for that power, and on the notice and terms, if any, that the court shall prescribe.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 53; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 53; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 61; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 61; G.L. 1938, ch. 624, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-6-3

.

13-6-4.
Application for administration of prisoner’s estate.

Whenever any person shall be imprisoned in the adult correctional institutions for life or for a term of seven (7) years or more, any creditor of that person may apply to the probate court of the city or town in which the prisoner last lived and was domiciled in this state, or in which he or she shall have any estate, for letters of administration to be granted on the prisoner’s estate to the prisoner’s next of kin or to any disinterested person, during the imprisonment.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 54; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 54; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 62; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 62; G.L. 1938, ch. 624, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-6-4

.

13-6-5.
Notice and appointment of administrator.

The court may, after giving notice to all interested persons, grant the petition as provided in §

13-6-4

and do all other things required and authorized to be done in the settlement of the estate of a deceased person.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 385, § 55; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 55; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 63; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 63; G.L. 1938, ch. 624, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

13-6-5

.

13-6-6.
Powers of administrator.

Every administrator who shall be appointed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall have the same powers, be subject to the same liabilities, and discharge the same duties as an administrator of the estate of a deceased person.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 57; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 57; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 65; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 65; G.L. 1938, ch. 624, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

13-6-6

.

13-6-7.
Bond to secure estate to prisoner — Life prisoners.

The bond given by the administrator appointed pursuant to §

13-6-5

shall secure to the prisoner, after he or she shall be discharged from the adult correctional institutions, whatever shall remain of his or her estate after payment of his or her debts, the expenses of settling his or her estate, and any sums that the probate court may, from time to time, direct or allow for the support of his or her family. In case of imprisonment for life, the estate of the prisoner shall be divided among his or her heirs at law and distributed in the same way as though he or she were dead.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 56; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 56; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 64; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 64; G.L. 1938, ch. 624, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-6-7

.